Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 5 Election Procedure Generally
7-5-202. Public notice of elections.

(a)(1)

It shall be the duty of the county board of election commissioners at least twenty (20) days before each preferential primary and general election and at least ten (10) days before the holding of each general primary, general runoff, school, or special election to give public notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county of:

(A)

The date of the election;

(B)

The hours of voting on election day;

(C)

The places and times for early voting;

(D)

Polling sites for holding the elections in the county;

(E)

The candidates and offices to be elected at that time;

(F)

The time and location of the opening, processing, canvassing, and counting of ballots; and

(G)

The location where a list of appointed election officials, deputy county clerks, or additional deputies hired to conduct early voting can be found and the date the list is available.

(2)

A person shall not serve as an election official if:

(A)

The person is:

(i)

Married to or related within the second degree of consanguinity to a candidate running for office in the election;

(ii)

The spouse of a member of a county board of election commissioners; or

(iii)

A county party chair or his or her spouse; and

(B)

Another person makes an objection to his or her service to the county board of election commissioners within ten (10) calendar days after posting the list of officials.

(3)

The public notice shall contain directions for filing an objection to the service of an election official, deputy county clerk, or additional deputy.

(b)(1)

At least five (5) days prior to a preferential primary, general primary, general election, general runoff, or special election, a copy of the public notice may be posted at each polling site fixed for holding the election and shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county.

(2)(A)

At least fifteen (15) days before the beginning of early voting and the election day, each county board of election commissioners or county clerk shall prepare and post in a public place in the county clerk's office its list of appointed election officials, deputy county clerks, or additional deputies hired to conduct early voting.

(B)

The list may appoint election officials, deputy county clerks, or additional deputies hired to conduct early voting in the event of a runoff election.

(c)(1)

On the day of any election, the following shall be posted at each polling site and remain posted continuously therein until the polls close:

(A)

The public notice required in subsection (a) of this section;

(B)(i)

At least two (2) sample ballots, marked with the word “SAMPLE”, of each ballot style that will be used at the polling site.

(ii)

If the polling site has more than fifteen (15) ballot styles and has posted a sample ballot for each ballot style via an internet website before the beginning of early voting, the polling site may provide the following in lieu of the sample ballots under subdivision (c)(1)(B)(i) of this section:

(a)

At least two (2) bound volumes that include each sample ballot, marked with the word “SAMPLE”; or

(b)

At least one (1) bound volume that includes each sample ballot, marked with the word “SAMPLE”, and at least one (1) electronic device that allows voters to access a sample ballot for each ballot style;

(C)

Two (2) copies of the full text of all measures on the ballot;

(D)

At least two (2) copies of instructions on how to vote, including how to cast a provisional ballot and instructions for fail-safe voting;

(E)

General information on voting rights under applicable federal and state laws, including information on the right of an individual to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how to contact the appropriate officials if these rights are alleged to have been violated;

(F)

General information on federal and state laws regarding prohibitions on acts of fraud and misrepresentation;

(G)(i)

Double-sided signs containing the words “VOTE HERE”.

(ii)

Each sign shall be at least two feet by two feet (2' x 2') in size and shall contain an arrow pointing to the polling site.

(iii)

A sign shall be posted near each main driveway entrance to the polling site on each public street bordering the polling site so as to be visible to all traffic approaching the polling site.

(iv)

The sign shall be as close as possible to the public street without obstructing traffic; and

(H)

One (1) printout from each voting machine, terminal, or ballot tabulator showing that the candidate and question counters register zero (0).

(2)

If a county is providing sample ballots for a specified polling site in bound volumes or electronic databases under subdivision (c)(1)(B)(ii) of this section, the county shall ensure the bound volumes or electronic databases are organized so that a voter may easily identify the sample ballot corresponding with his or her precinct-part.

(d)

The Secretary of State shall provide to each county board of election commissioners and each county clerk the information to be posted at each polling site according to subdivisions (c)(1)(E) and (F) of this section.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, §§ 4, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-604, 3-605; Acts 1997, No. 451, § 7; 1999, No. 1490, § 3; 2001, No. 474, § 1; 2003, No. 994, § 3; 2005, No. 138, § 1; 2005, No. 1677, § 3; 2007, No. 222, § 4; 2007, No. 556, § 1; 2017, No. 798, § 1; 2019, No. 199, § 1; 2019, No. 258, § 1; 2019, No. 398, § 1; 2019, No. 473, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 222 deleted “absentee” preceding “ballots” in (a)(5); added (b)(2) and made a related change; deleted “information” preceding “shall be” in the introductory paragraph of (c); in (c)(2), substituted “At least two (2)” for “A” and “ballots, marked with the word 'SAMPLE', of each ballot style that will be used at the polling site” for “version of the ballot or ballots, that will be used for that election”; inserted present (c)(3) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; rewrote (c)(4); added (c)(7) and (c)(8) and made related changes; and substituted “(c)(5) and (6)” for “(c)(4) and (5)” in (d).

The 2007 amendment by No. 556 added (a)(3) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and deleted “absentee” preceding “ballots” in (a)(6).

The 2017 amendment redesignated the former introductory language of (a) as the present introductory language of (a)(1); redesignated former (a)(1) through (a)(6) as present (a)(1)(A) through (a)(1)(F); added (a)(1)(G); added (a)(2) and (a)(3); redesignated former (b)(2) as present (b)(2)(A); in present (b)(2)(A), substituted “before the beginning of early voting and the election day” for “prior to the election”, inserted “or county clerk”, and added “deputy county clerks, or additional deputies hired to conduct early voting”; added (b)(2)(B); inserted “terminal, or ballot tabulator” in (c)(8); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 199 redesignated former (c) as (c)(1); added (c)(1)(B)(ii); added (c)(2); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 258 deleted “deputy county clerk, or additional deputy” preceding “if” in the introductory language of (a)(2); added (a)(2)(A)(ii) and (a)(2)(A)(iii); and redesignated former provisions of (a)(2)(A) as (a)(2)(A)(i).

The 2019 amendment by No. 398 substituted “showing that” for “showing whether” in (c)(8) [now (c)(1)(H)].

The 2019 amendment by No. 473 inserted “school” in the introductory language of (a)(1).

7-5-203. Certification of candidate lists.

(a)(1)

Not less than seventy-five (75) days before each general election day, the Secretary of State shall certify to all county boards of election commissioners full lists of all candidates to be voted for in their respective counties as the nominations have been certified or otherwise properly submitted to him or her.

(2)

A name of a person shall not be certified and shall not be placed on the ballot if prior to the certification deadline a candidate on the list:

(A)

Notifies the Secretary of State in writing, signed by the candidate and acknowledged before an officer authorized to take acknowledgements, of his or her desire to withdraw as a candidate for the office or position; or

(B)

Dies.

(b)(1)

Not less than seventy-five (75) days before each general election day, the clerk of each county shall certify to the county board of election commissioners of his or her county a full list of all candidates to be voted for in the county as the nominations have been certified or otherwise properly submitted to him or her.

(2)

A name of a person shall not be certified and shall not be placed on the ballot if prior to the certification deadline a candidate on the list:

(A)

Notifies the county clerk in writing, signed by the candidate and acknowledged before an officer authorized to take acknowledgements, of his or her desire to withdraw as a candidate for the office or position; or

(B)

Dies.

(c)

However, in special elections held to fill vacancies or to elect officers in case of a tie vote, the certification shall issue at the time specified in the writ of election issued by the appropriately constituted authority.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 6; 1985, No. 1055, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-606; Acts 1997, No. 451, § 8; 1999, No. 1490, § 4; 2005, No. 67, § 6; 2007, No. 1049, § 18; 2009, No. 1480, § 17; 2011, No. 1185, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “seventy-five (75)” for “fifty (50)” in (a) and (b).

The 2009 amendment rewrote (a) and (b).

The 2011 amendment substituted “seventy-five (75)” for “seventy (70)” in (a)(1) and (b)(1); inserted “properly” in (a)(1) and (b)(1); and inserted “deadline” in (a)(2) and (b)(2).

7-5-204. Certification of measures and questions submitted to voters.

(a)

Whenever a proposed amendment to the Arkansas Constitution or other measure or question is to be submitted to a vote of the people, the Secretary of State shall not certify the amendment, measure, or question to the county board of election commissioners of each county in the state less than seventy-five (75) days before each general election day.

(b)

The county board of election commissioners shall include the amendment, measure, or question in the posting that it is required to make under §7-5-206.

(c)(1)

If the Secretary of State has not determined the sufficiency of a petition for an amendment or a measure by the seventy-fifth day before the general election or if an amendment or a measure has been challenged for any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the Secretary of State shall nonetheless transmit the amendment or measure and the ballot title of each amendment and measure to the county election commissions to make any required posting and to place the amendment or measure on the ballot.

(2)

If the petition for the amendment or measure is subsequently declared insufficient by the Secretary of State or a court of competent jurisdiction or if held to be invalid for any other reason, no votes regarding the amendment or measure shall be counted or certified.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-607; Acts 1997, No. 451, § 9; 1999, No. 1490, § 5; 2007, No. 222, § 5; 2007, No. 1049, § 19; 2009, No. 959, § 4; 2011, No. 1185, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 222 inserted “measures and” in the section heading; inserted “measure or,” substituted “sixty (60)” for “fifty (50),” ”measure, or” for “in,” “measure, or question” for “in question,” and deleted the last sentence.

The 2007 amendment by No. 1049 subdivided the text into (a) and (b); in present (a), inserted “measure or” in two places, and substituted “seventy (70)” for “fifty (50)”; deleted the former last sentence in present (b); added (c); and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment inserted “nonetheless” in (c)(1), and made a minor punctuation change.

The 2011 amendment substituted “seventy-five (75)” for “seventy (70)” in (a); and substituted “seventy-fifth” for “seventieth” in (c)(1).

7-5-205. Write-in candidates' votes — When counted.

No votes for write-in candidates shall be counted or tabulated unless:

(1)

The candidate notifies in writing the county board of election commissioners of each county in which the candidate seeks election at least ninety (90) days prior to the election and files the notice with either:

(A)

The Secretary of State, if a candidate for the United States Senate, the United States House of Representatives, or any state or district office; or

(B)

The county clerk, if a candidate for a county or township office;

(2)

The candidate files with the county clerk or the Secretary of State, as required, a political practices pledge and an affidavit of eligibility for the office at the same time the candidate files his or her notice of write-in candidacy;

(3)

The notice of write-in candidacy, the political practices pledge, and the affidavit of eligibility are filed during the party filing period; and

(4)

The name written on the ballot is the same name listed on the write-in candidate's political practices pledge, except that any abbreviation, misspelling, or other minor variation in the form of the name of the candidate shall be disregarded if the intention of the voter may be ascertained.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 14; 1985, No. 1055, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-614; Acts 1987, No. 247, § 1; 1987, No. 933, § 1; 1989, No. 912, § 1; 1997, No. 451, § 10; 1999, No. 640, § 1; 2001, No. 955, § 1; 2001, No. 1789, § 4; 2003, No. 542, § 2; 2003, No. 1165, § 4; 2007, No. 222, § 6; 2009, No. 1480, § 18; 2011, No. 1185, § 5; 2015, No. 26, §
1; 2019, No. 597, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment inserted “of each county in which the candidate seeks election” in (a)(1).

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2011 amendment substituted “no later than the last day of the party filing period” for “no earlier than noon on the last day of the party filing period and not later than ninety (90) days before the election day” in (3).

The 2015 amendment inserted “at least ninety (90) days prior to the election” in the introductory language of (1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “filed during the party filing period” for “filed no later than the last day of the party filing period” in (3).

7-5-206. Publication requirements.

The county board of election commissioners shall make publication of all nominations, of all proposed amendments to the Arkansas Constitution, and of all other measures and questions required by law to be submitted to the electors at any election by posting a list thereof at the door of the courthouse at least ten (10) days before the day of the election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-608; Acts 1995, No. 497, § 2; 1995, No. 1085, § 2; 1997, No. 451, § 11; 2005, No. 67, § 7; 2007, No. 222, § 7; 2007, No. 1020, § 2; 2009, No. 959, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 222 substituted “measures and questions” for “questions.”

The 2007 amendment by No. 1020 deleted former (b).

The 2009 amendment deleted “filed with it, of all nominations certified to it by the Secretary of State” following “all nominations,” deleted “certified to it by the Secretary of State or” following “questions,” and made a related change.

7-5-207. Ballots — Names included — Draw for ballot position.

(a)(1)

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, all election ballots provided by the county board of election commissioners of any county in this state for any election shall contain in the proper place the name of every candidate whose nomination for any office to be filled at that election has been certified to the county board of election commissioners and shall not contain the name of any candidate or person who has not been certified.

(2)(A)

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this section, unopposed candidates for all offices, including school board positions, shall be declared and certified elected without the necessity of including those names on the general election ballot.

(B)(i)

In an election in which one (1) or more candidates are unopposed, the phrase “unopposed candidates” shall appear on the ballot, adjacent to a place in which the voter may cast a vote for all unopposed candidates by placing an appropriate mark.

(ii)

Votes received by an unopposed candidate in any election in this state may be counted or tabulated by the election officials for administrative purposes, but shall not be certified unless otherwise provided by law.

(iii)

Votes received by an unopposed candidate for the office of Governor, Mayor, Circuit Clerk, City Clerk, or the office of a nonjudicial state elected official shall be counted or tabulated by the election officials and certified according to law.

(iv)

The names of all unopposed candidates for the office of Mayor, Governor, Circuit Clerk, City Clerk, and the office of a nonjudicial state elected official shall be separately placed on the general election ballot, and the votes for Mayor, Governor, Circuit Clerk, City Clerk, and a nonjudicial state elected official shall be tabulated as in all contested races.

(v)

All unopposed candidates, other than for the offices of Mayor, Governor, Circuit Clerk, City Clerk, and the office of a nonjudicial state elected official, shall be declared and certified as elected in the same manner as if the candidate had been voted upon at the election.

(b)

No person's name shall be placed upon the ballot as a candidate for any public office in this state at any election unless the person is qualified and eligible at the time of filing, or as otherwise may be provided by law, as a candidate for the office to hold the public office for which he or she is a candidate, except if a person is not qualified to hold the office at the time of filing because of age alone, the name of the person shall be placed on the ballot as a candidate for the office if the person will qualify to hold the office at the time prescribed by law for taking office.

(c)(1)

The order in which the names of the candidates shall appear on the ballot shall be determined by lot at a public meeting of the county board of election commissioners not less than seventy-two (72) days before the general election.

(2)

Notice of the public meeting shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least three (3) days before the drawing.

(3)

For runoff elections, the ballot order for eligible candidates shall be the same as for the previous election leading to the runoff.

(d)(1)

Adjacent to the name of each candidate in the general election shall be:

(A)

His or her party designation; or

(B)

The term “INDEPENDENT” if he or she represents no officially recognized party.

(2)

Subdivision (d)(1) of this section does not apply to a:

(A)

Nonpartisan election; or

(B)

Nonpartisan municipal election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 13; 1971, No. 224, § 1; 1971, No. 261, §§ 20, 22; 1971, No. 355, §§ 1-3; 1971, No. 725, § 1; 1979, No. 389, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-613, 3-615; Acts 1997, No. 451, § 12; 2007, No. 1049, § 15; 2009, No. 959, § 6; 2009, No. 1480, § 19; 2011, No. 1185, § 6; 2013, No. 1110, § 4; 2017, No. 730, § 1; 2019, No. 254, § 1; 2019, No. 597, § 7; 2019, No. 1013, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “no later than seventy (70) days before the election” for “prior to the printing of the ballots” in (a), and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 inserted “or as otherwise may be provided by law” in (b), and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1480 rewrote (a); substituted “placed” for “printed” twice in (b); and added (c) and (d).

The 2011 amendment substituted “seventy-two (72)” for “sixty-five (65)” in (c)(1).

The 2013 amendment substituted “Adjacent to” for “Beside or adjacent to” in (d)(1); substituted “does” for “shall” in (d)(2); and deleted “judicial” following “Nonpartisan” in (d)(2)(A).

The 2017 amendment substituted “subdivision (a)(2)” for “subdivisions (a)(2) and (3)” in (a)(1); substituted “all offices” for “municipal offices” in (a)(2)(A); inserted “governor, and circuit clerk” twice in (a)(2)(B); and deleted (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 254 inserted “city clerk” twice in (a)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 597 inserted “including school board positions” in (a)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1013 rewrote (a)(2)(B).

7-5-208. Ballots — Form.

(a)

All election ballots provided by the county board of election commissioners of any county in this state for any election shall be alike and shall be in plain type.

(b)(1)

The heading of each ballot shall be:
“OFFICIAL BALLOT
(description)
ELECTION
(date)
,
(year)

Vote by placing an appropriate mark opposite the person for whom you wish to vote.”

(2)

If the ballot contains an initiated or referred amendment, act, or measure, the heading shall also contain these words: “Vote on amendments, acts, and measures by placing an appropriate mark below the amendment (or act or measure) either FOR or AGAINST.”

(c)(1)

Every ballot shall contain the name of each candidate who has been nominated or has qualified in accordance with law for each office. The names of the candidates shall be listed in a perpendicular column under the name of each office to be filled.

(2)

In all elections in which votes for a write-in candidate may be counted, at the bottom of each list of names for each position or office appearing on the ballot, there shall be a blank line for a possible write-in vote for that position or office. However, the blank line shall not appear on the ballot with respect to those offices and candidates for positions in which no person has qualified as a write-in candidate by filing his or her notice of intention to be a write-in candidate within the time prescribed in §7-5-205.

(d)

Adjacent to the name of each candidate and on the same line there shall be a place for marking a vote for the candidate. Below each act, amendment, or measure to be voted on, there shall be the words “FOR” and “AGAINST” situated one above the other with a place for marking a vote for the act, amendment, or measure adjacent to each word and on the same line.

(e)

Opposite the designation of each office, there shall appear these words: “VOTE FOR
.” The number of persons required to fill the vacancy in office shall be placed in the blank space.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 13; 1971, No. 224, § 1; 1971, No. 261, §§ 11, 20, 22; 1971, No. 355, §§ 1-3; 1979, No. 389, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-613; Acts 1987, No. 280, §§ 1, 2; 1993, No. 1011, § 1; 1995, No. 461, § 1; 1997, No. 451, § 13; 1999, No. 640, § 2; 2005, No. 1677, § 4; 2005, No. 2233, § 3; 2007, No. 705, § 1; 2007, No. 1049, § 16; 2009, No. 1480, § 20; 2011, No. 1020, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 705 deleted former (d) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; substituted “below” for “above” in present (d)(2); rewrote the introductory language in present (e); in present (f), rewrote (2)(A) and (3), and in (5), inserted “except for the nonpartisan judicial general election”; rewrote present (g) and (h); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendment by No. 1049, in present (f)(4), substituted “sixty-five (65)” for “thirty-five (35),” and made a stylistic change.

The 2009 amendment deleted “Paper” at the beginning of the section heading; and rewrote the section.

The 2011 amendment substituted “below” for “above” (b)(2).

7-5-209. Ballots — Correction of errors.

Whenever it shall appear by affidavit that an error or omission has occurred in the publication of the names or description of candidates nominated for office or in the preparation of ballots, the county board of election commissioners shall in a public meeting announce the error or omission and immediately correct the error or omission or show cause why the correction should not be done.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-612; Acts 1997, No. 451, § 14; 2009, No. 1480, § 21.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “preparation” for “printing.”

7-5-210. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning ballots, was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 22. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-610; Acts 1995, No. 601, § 1; 2007, No. 1020, § 3.

7-5-211. Delivery of election supplies.

(a)

At least one (1) day before any election:

(1)(A)

The county board of election commissioners shall designate a suitable person or persons and deliver to the person or persons the ballots.

(B)

The person shall not be an elected official, an elected official's deputy, or a candidate for office; and

(2)

For each set of poll workers in each polling place, the county board of election commissioners shall deliver to the designated person or persons the following additional election supplies if applicable:

(A)

A good and sufficient ballot box with numbered seals;

(B)

Sufficient list-of-voters forms adequate to record the names of all registered voters who appear to vote in the polling place;

(C)

A precinct voter registration list;

(D)

Sufficient tally sheets;

(E)

Envelopes to seal the ballots and certificates;

(F)

Separate sheets containing blank forms of certificates prepared to enable the poll workers to properly certify the paper ballot count at the polling site, upon which certificates shall be endorsed a blank form of oath to be taken by the poll workers before entering upon the discharge of their duties;

(G)

Voter registration application forms for voters using fail-safe voting and other record-keeping supplies necessary to document fail-safe voting procedures; and

(H)

In those counties in which an optical scanner is used to count paper ballots, the marking instrument recommended by the manufacturer of the optical scanner for proper marking on the ballots shall be provided.

(b)

The county board of election commissioners shall be responsible for the security of the delivered election materials.

(c)

The county board of election commissioners shall be responsible for providing ballots and election materials for absentee and early voting to the county clerk before the beginning day for absentee and early voting.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 11; 1973, No. 157, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-611; Acts 1995, No. 601, § 2; 1995, No. 946, § 3; 1995, No. 963, § 3; 1997, No. 451, § 15; 1999, No. 920, § 1; 2001, No. 1178, § 1; 2007, No. 1020, § 4; 2009, No. 959, § 7; 2009, No. 1480, § 23.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “an elected” for “the elected” in (a)(1)(B); substituted “polling place” for “precinct” twice in (a)(2); and substituted “the paper ballot count at the polling site” for “the result of the election” in (a)(2)(F).

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” in three places in (a)(2); and made a minor stylistic change in (c).

The 2009 amendment by No. 1480 deleted “as set forth in §7-5-210” at the end of (a)(1)(A).

7-5-212. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning permanent ink when ballots counted by hand, was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 24. The section was derived from Acts 1999, No. 920, § 2.

Subchapter 3

— Conduct of Elections

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1973, No. 157, § 10: Feb. 20, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present laws of the state, that separate or common polling places cannot be established by county committees in counties using voting machines without attendant substantial costs; that it is essential to the proper and economical administration of the election laws of this state that legislation be enacted immediately to provide that respective county committees or county election commissions in counties using voting machines may designate separate and/or common polling places where all elections can be held and to provide for a minimum number of election officials to serve at such polling places so that substantial economies can be realized in the conduct of such elections. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 104, § 3: Feb. 19, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law requires polls to be opened at eight (8) o'clock a.m. and that in many instances it would be of great benefit to the voters for the polls to open prior to eight (8) o'clock and that this act is immediately necessary to grant the voting officials the flexibility to open the polls prior to eight (8) o'clock if they deem necessary. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 946 and 963, § 14: Jan. 1, 1996.

Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 48: Jan. 1, 2006.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 1189, §
4: Jan. 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, No. 595, § 7, provided: “This act shall become effective upon the later of the following:

“(1)

January 1, 2014; or

“(2)

The appropriation and availability of funding to the Secretary of State for the issuance of voter identification cards under Section 5 of this act.”The contingency in Acts 2013, No. 595, § 7 was met by Acts 2013, No. 1376.

7-5-301. Acquisition, use, and cost of voting systems.

(a)

The casting and counting of votes in all elections shall be by:

(1)

Voting machines selected by the Secretary of State;

(2)

Electronic vote tabulating devices in combination with voting machines accessible to voters with disabilities to be selected by the Secretary of State; or

(3)

Paper ballots counted by hand in combination with voting machines accessible to voters with disabilities selected by the Secretary of State.

(b)(1)

All direct recording electronic voting machines shall include a voter-verified paper audit trail.

(2)

All direct recording electronic voting machines shall include a voter-verified paper audit trail.

(c)(1)

The quorum court of each county shall choose by resolution a voting system containing voting machines or electronic vote tabulating devices, or both, or voting machines in combination with paper ballots counted by hand for use in all elections in the county.

(2)

Any voting machine or electronic vote tabulating devices chosen by the quorum court shall be those selected by the Secretary of State.

(3)

Any voting system used in elections for federal office shall comply with the requirements of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002.

(d)(1)

Voting machines and electronic vote tabulating devices shall be purchased pursuant to a competitive bidding process with consideration given to:

(A)

Price;

(B)

Quality; and

(C)

Adaptability to Arkansas ballot requirements.

(2)(A)

The Secretary of State shall establish guidelines and procedures for a grant program to distribute funds from the County Voting System Grant Fund, §19-5-1247.

(B)

A grant provided to a county from the County Voting System Grant Fund, §19-5-1247, shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the voting system grant fund.

(C)

Moneys deposited into the voting system grant fund shall be appropriated by the quorum court according to the guidelines established by the Secretary of State under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section.

(e)

The Secretary of State or the county shall not purchase or procure any voting machine or electronic vote tabulating device unless the party selling the machine or device shall:

(1)

Guarantee the machines in writing for a period of one (1) year; and

(2)

Provide, if deemed necessary by the county, personnel for the supervision and training of county personnel for at least two (2) elections, one (1) primary and one (1) general at no additional cost to the county or the Secretary of State.

(f)

Each county shall provide polling places that are adequate for the operation of the voting system, including, but not limited to, access, if necessary, to a sufficient number of electrical outlets and telephone lines.

(g)

Each county shall provide or contract for adequate technical support for the installation, set up, and operation of the voting system for each election.

(h)

The Secretary of State shall be responsible for the development, implementation, and provision of a continuing program to educate voters and election officials in the proper use of the voting system.

(i)

Electronic vote tabulating devices and voting machines, authorized as provided under this subchapter, may be acquired and used in any election upon the adoption of an ordinance by the quorum court of the county.

(j)

The costs of using electronic vote tabulating devices and voting machines at all general and special elections, including, but not limited to, costs of supplies, technical assistance, and transportation of the systems to and from the polling places, shall be paid in accordance with §7-5-104.

(k)

The county board of election commissioners shall have complete control and supervision of voting machines and electronic vote tabulating devices at all elections.

(l)

The county clerk shall have supervision of voting machines and electronic vote tabulating devices used for early voting in the clerk's designated early voting location.

(m)(1)

The county board of election commissioners shall have the care and custody of all voting machines and all electronic vote tabulating devices while not in use.

(2)

The county board of election commissioners shall be responsible for the proper preparation, use, maintenance, and care of the voting machines and the electronic vote tabulating devices during the period of time required for that election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 2; 1971, No. 261, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-702; Acts 1995, No. 946, § 4; 1995, No. 963, § 4; 1997, No. 451, § 16; 2005, No. 2233, § 4; 2007, No. 1020, § 5; 2009, No. 959, §§ 8, 9; 2011, No. 1189, § 2; 2013, No. 277, § 1; 2015, No. 1218, § 4; 2019, No. 399, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted “board of election commissioners” following “county” in (e).

The 2009 amendment deleted “in use on or after January 1, 2006” following the first instance of “voting machines” in (b)(1); deleted (h)(2); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment rewrote (d)(2)(A); inserted (d)(2)(B) and (d)(2)(C); and deleted (d)(3).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (d)(2)(A); deleted ”the fund to be known as” following “the credit of” in (d)(2)(B); and rewrote (d)(2)(C).

The 2015 amendment added “at no additional cost to the county or the Secretary of State” at the end of (e)(2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “except that those direct recording electronic voting machines in use during the 2004 general election may include a voter-verified paper audit trail at the discretion of the county board of election commissioners” at the end of (b)(1); and deleted “purchased on or after January 1, 2006” following “voting machines” in (b)(2).

U.S. Code.

The Help America Vote Act of 2002, referred to in subsection (c) of this section, is codified as 52 U.S.C. § 20901 et seq.

7-5-302. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning inspection of supplies and posting of documents, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 222, § 8. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-706; Acts 1995, No. 946, § 5; 1995, No. 963, § 5; 2005, No. 2233, § 5.

7-5-303. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning inspection of ballots by judges, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 451, § 17. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-705.

7-5-304. Opening and closing polls — Time.

(a)

The polls shall be opened at 7:30 a.m., and they shall remain open continuously until 7:30 p.m.

(b)

In all counties, when the polls close, all persons who have presented themselves for voting and who are then in line at the polling site shall be permitted to cast their votes.

(c)(1)

A person who votes in an election as a result of a federal or state court order or any other order extending the time established for closing the polls may vote in that election only by casting a provisional ballot.

(2)

The ballot shall be separated and held apart from other provisional ballots cast by those not affected by the order.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 1; 1981, No. 104, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-701; Acts 1993, No. 515, § 1; 2007, No. 1020, § 6; 2009, No. 959, § 10.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added (b).

The 2009 amendment added (c), and made a minor punctuation change.